Washington statutes.
RCW 15.130.230

Alteration prohibited.

A person may not change, mutilate, destroy, obliterate, or remove any part of food labeling, or do any other act that results in a food being adulterated or misbranded after shipment in intrastate commerce and while the food is held for sale.

[ 2018 c 236 s 204.]